Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Article 2. Board of Land Commissioners

§ 36-7-201.
Meetings; president; duty; quorum.

The board shall meet at least once in each month, at such time as the board may prescribe, for the transaction of business. The governor shall be president of the board, and it shall be his duty to sign all contracts, papers or documents that shall be approved, made or directed by the board. Provided, however, that all leases approved or directed to be entered into by the board of land commissioners may be signed for and on behalf of the state by the director. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any and all business; and in the absence of the governor, one (1) of the other members may act as president pro tempore and may preside at such meeting.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 936; C.S. 1910, § 663; C.S. 1920, § 771; R.S. 1931, § 91-703; C.S. 1945, § 24-403; W.S. 1957, § 36-87; Laws 1965, ch. 139, § 1; 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Cross references. —

For other provisions as to president of board and meetings, see §§

36-2-103

and

36-2-104

.

As to appeals in connection with the decisions of board, see §

36-2-201

et seq.

For powers and duties of board as to reclamation of land, see §

36-7-301

et seq.

As to powers and duties of board with reference to settlement of land, see §

36-7-401

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

In R.S. 1931, §§ 91-702 and 91-703 (§§

36-7-102

and

36-7-201

) were reworded, apparently to comply with the changes made by the amendment to art. 18, § 3, Wyo. Const., by Laws 1921, p. 293, and with the provisions of Laws 1929, ch. 108, §§ 2 and 5, which designated the members of the board of land commissioners, prescribed its powers and provided for the meetings of the board and the rules and regulations therefor. These sections were restored by the 1945 compiler to read as originally enacted, and Laws 1929, ch. 108, §§ 2 and 5, are set out herein as §§

36-2-101

and

36-2-104

.

Invalid contract. —

Contract by which company which obtained license from board to construct irrigation works gave to third person exclusive right to contract with settlers for perpetual water rights within a fixed cost range was contrary to law and against public policy. McKinney v. Big Horn Basin Development Co., 167 F. 770, 1909 U.S. App. LEXIS 4379 (8th Cir. Wyo. 1909).

§ 36-7-202.
Special meetings; duties of secretary.

The president shall have the power to call a special meeting, if in his judgment, public good requires the same to be done for any purpose contemplated in this chapter, or any other chapter prescribing the duty of said board; and such call may be either a personal or written notice. The object of such meeting shall be made a matter of record by the secretary of the board. The director shall be the secretary of such board, and it shall be his duty to keep a careful record of the transactions of such board in a substantially bound book to be kept for that purpose, and which shall be known as the record and proceedings of the board of land commissioners as to Carey Act matters. The secretary shall countersign all papers, instruments or documents approved, made or directed by the board bearing the signature of the president.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 4; R.S. 1899, § 937; C.S. 1910, § 664; Laws 1919, ch. 38, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 772; R.S. 1931, § 91-704; C.S. 1945, § 24-404; W.S. 1957, § 36-88; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to duties of director, see §

36-3-102

.

Carey Act. —

See note following chapter heading.

§ 36-7-203.
Office; duties of director.

The board shall have an office in Cheyenne. The director shall be in charge of the office. He shall have the custody of the records of the board; shall receive and file all proposals for the construction of irrigation works to reclaim lands selected under the provisions of this act; prepare and keep for public inspection maps or plats, on a scale of two (2) inches to the mile, of all lands selected; receive entries of settlers on these lands, and hear or receive the final proof of their reclamation, and do any and all work required by the board in carrying out the provisions of this act. He shall have authority to administer oaths whenever necessary in the performance of his duties.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 6; R.S. 1899, § 939; C.S. 1910, § 665; C.S. 1920, § 773; R.S. 1931, § 91-705; C.S. 1945, § 24-405; W.S. 1957, § 36-89; Laws 1975, ch. 140, § 2; 1992, ch 55, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to other duties of director, see §

36-3-102

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following §

36-7-103

.

§ 36-7-204.
Rules; copies of maps, plats and contracts; annual report of contractors; waiver of rules.

The board shall provide suitable rules for the filing of proposals for constructing irrigation works, and for the entry of and payment for the land by settlers, and for the forfeiting of entry by settlers upon failure to comply with the provisions of this act. There shall be kept in the office of the board, for public inspection, copies of all maps, plats, contracts for the construction of irrigation works, and of the entries of land by settlers. It shall require from each person, company of persons, association or incorporated company engaged in the construction of irrigation works, under the provisions of this act, an annual report, to be submitted to the board on or before November first of each year. This report shall show the number of water rights sold, the number of users of water under said irrigation works, the legal subdivisions of land for which water is to be furnished, the names of the officers of the company, the acreage of land which the said irrigation works is prepared to supply with water, and such other data as the board sees fit to require. The rules required by this section may be waived in the case of irrigation works being constructed by a person, colony or association of persons to furnish water for land settled upon and being reclaimed by themselves.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 23; R.S. 1899, § 964; C.S. 1910, § 690; C.S. 1920, § 803; R.S. 1931, § 91-735; C.S. 1945, § 24-431; W.S. 1957, § 36-90.

Cross references. —

As to rules and regulations, see also §

36-2-107

.

As to irrigation generally, see chapter 5 of title 41.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note following §

36-7-103

.

§ 36-7-205.
Duties of employees; fees.

The board shall prescribe the duties of all its employees and shall collect the following fees: for filing each application, one dollar ($1.00); for filing each final proof, one dollar ($1.00); for issuing each patent, one dollar ($1.00); for making certified copies of papers or records, the same fees as provided for to be charged by the secretary of state for like services. The money collected for fees shall be paid to the treasurer of the state and by him credited to the general fund.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 24; R.S. 1899, § 965; C.S. 1910, § 641; C.S. 1920, § 804; R.S. 1931, § 91-736; C.S. 1945, § 24-432; W.S. 1957, § 36-91; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to duties of employees, see also §

36-2-103

.

As to fees required by secretary of state, see §

9-1-305

.

§ 36-7-206.
Annual report.

The board shall issue, on or before November thirtieth of each year, a report setting forth in detail the names, location and character of the irrigation works in process of construction, the acreage and legal subdivisions of land intended to be reclaimed, the estimated cost of said irrigation works, the price of water rights from such irrigation works, and the terms of payment for both water rights and land. Not less than five thousand (5,000) copies of such report shall be printed for gratuitous distribution.

History.

Laws 1895, ch. 38, § 25; R.S. 1899, § 966; C.S. 1910, § 692; C.S. 1920, § 805; R.S. 1931, § 91-737; C.S. 1945, § 24-433; W.S. 1957, § 36-92.

Cross references. —

As to director's annual report, see §

36-3-105

.

§ 36-7-207.
Grants of rights-of-way to counties.

The board of land commissioners is hereby empowered, under such terms and regulations as may be provided by it, to grant to the counties of this state, either temporary or permanent rights-of-way for roads and highways, over and across lands ceded to the state under the provisions of an act approved August 18, 1894, known as the Carey Act [43 U.S.C. § 641], and the title to which lands is still vested in the state at the time such grant is made.

History.

Laws 1913, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 774; R.S. 1931, § 91-706; C.S. 1945, § 24-441; W.S. 1957, § 36-93.

Carey Act. —

See note following chapter heading.